Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
238

USE TAX
LAW

Section

238-1 Definitions, generally

238-2 Imposition of tax on tangible personal
property;

exemptions

238-2.3 Imposition of tax on imported services or
contracting;

exemptions

238-2.5 Repealed

238-2.6 County surcharge on state tax;
administration

238-3 Application of tax, etc.

238-4 Certain property used by producers

238-5 Returns

238-6 Collection of tax by seller; penalty

238-7 Audits; additional assessments; refunds

238-8 Appeal, correction of assessment

238-9 Records

238-9.5 Motor vehicle importation; report by
dealers; proof

of payment

238-10 Penalties

238-11 Collection of taxes by assumpsit or
distraint;

concurrent jurisdiction of district judges

238-12 Repealed

238-13 Other provisions of general excise tax law

applicable

238-14 Taxes state realizations

238-15 Short title

238-16 Rules and regulations

Law Journals and Reviews

Taxes in Hawaii Since July 1, 1968: A Report on the
Unreported Decisions of Judge Dick Yin Wong, Arthur B. Reinwald, 9 HBJ 95.

Hawaii's General Excise Tax Law: A Comprehensive Review of
the Decisions. II HBJ No. 13, at pg. 1.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next